District of Columbia statutes.
2-218.76

Repealed

Commercial Revitalization Assistance Fund.

Repealed.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2376
as added Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2242, 57 DCR 6242
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 2143, 59 DCR 8025
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 9021(a), 61 DCR 9990
This section is referenced in § 2-1215.20.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 added “provided, that the Fund shall not be used to provide commercial Clean Team services within a geographic area that is subject to a Business Improvement District, as defined in § 2-1215.02(7); except, that beginning in fiscal year 2013, the commercial Clean Team services shall include service in the vicinity of the intersection of Minnesota Avenue, S.E., and Pennsylvania Avenue, S.E.” in (b).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see §§ 9021(a) and 9029 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 9021(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 9021(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
Short title: Section 2241 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that subtitle U of title II of the act may be cited as the “Commercial Revitalization Segregated Fund Amendment Act of 2010”.
Section 9029 of D.C. Law 20-155 provided that the repeal by § 9021 of the act shall apply as of September 30, 2014.